Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 11

CoverKids Act of 2006 [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

71-3-1101. Short title. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “CoverKids Act of 2006.”

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 11, provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 United States Code § 2000d.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 13 provided that the provisions of the act shall be reviewed annually by the senate commerce, labor and agriculture committee and the house commerce committee and the committees shall recommend necessary changes to the governor and the general assembly.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1102. Part definitions. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the department of finance and administration;

“Enrollee” means an individual who is eligible and enrolled in the program;

“Program” means any program established to provide health coverage to children pursuant to this part;

“Tennessee medicaid program” means the federal- and state-financed, state-run program of medical assistance established pursuant to Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), including any waivers thereof;

“Title XIX” means Title XIX of the Social Security Act, Subchapter XIX, Chapter 7 of Title 42, United States Code (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), providing grants to states for medical assistance programs; and

“Title XXI” means Title XXI of the Social Security Act, Subchapter XXI, Chapter 7 of Title 42, United States Code (42 U.S.C. §§ 1397aa, et seq.), establishing the State Children's Health Insurance Program.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1103. Purpose. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The purpose of this part is to create a program to provide health care coverage for uninsured children who are not eligible for health care services under any part of Tennessee's medicaid program, either pursuant to the medicaid state plan or pursuant to any medicaid waivers secured by the bureau of TennCare. It is the intent of the legislature to create and fund a program separate from the Tennessee medicaid program and Title XIX (42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq.), and not subject to any consent decrees or judicial orders applicable to the Tennessee medicaid program.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1104. Department authority — Not an entitlement program — Benefits subject to appropriations. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department is authorized to establish, administer, and monitor a program to provide health care coverage to uninsured children pursuant to Title XXI (42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.). The department may not use money appropriated for this program to expand eligibility criteria for the Tennessee medicaid program or any other program operated under this title. The program shall not constitute an entitlement to coverage for eligible individuals, and the availability of program benefits is subject to appropriations.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1105. Federal approval. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department is authorized to seek federal approval for the program, pursuant to Title XXI (42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.), through a state plan, state plan amendment or request for federal waivers.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1106. Rules and regulations regarding eligibility — Cap on enrollment — Development of an option for those who are ineligible. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to establish eligibility criteria for the program, which shall limit eligibility to an individual who:

Is eighteen (18) years of age or younger;

Has a combined family income at a level to be determined by the department;

Is not already covered by private insurance that offers creditable coverage, as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-3(c);

Is not eligible for coverage under the Tennessee medicaid program;

Is a United States citizen or qualified alien, as defined in 8 U.S.C. § 1641(b); and

Is a Tennessee resident.

The department may establish additional eligibility criteria as appropriate.

The department may establish a cap on the number of individuals who may be enrolled in the program.

The department may establish an option for individuals who do not meet eligibility criteria necessary to obtain Title XXI (42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.), funding to purchase coverage through the program.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1107. Coverage for pregnant women regardless of age. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department is authorized to provide health care coverage for pregnant women and may provide the coverage consistent with this part, except that no age-related eligibility restrictions shall apply to pregnant women.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1108. Program administration — Reporting and audit requirements. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department may administer the program directly or contract with insurance companies, managed care plans or other entities to provide services to enrollees. Payments for services to contracted entities may require the contractor to assume full or partial risk for the cost of services provided under the contract.

The department may contract directly with health care providers to provide services to enrollees and establish appropriate rates of payments for services.

The department may enter into contracts or interagency agreements with an outside entity or other state agency to assist in the administration of the program, including performing eligibility determinations and appeals.

The department shall establish periodic reporting requirements and audit requirements for contractors. Contractors and subcontractors shall maintain complete and detailed records as specified by the department regarding the operation of the plan, and shall provide the department and the comptroller of the treasury's office with access to records under the terms defined by the department.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1109. Duty and authority to review and audit expenditures. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury have the duty and authority to review and audit such expenditure of funds as may be made under this part. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the commissioner of finance and administration to ensure that program expenditures are maintained within legislative appropriations.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1110. Additional rules and regulations. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

The department may adopt additional rules and regulations governing the program, including, but not limited to, any rules or regulations necessary to comply with or to implement any federal requirement, federal waiver or state plan governing the program. The department is authorized to promulgate emergency rules pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. All rules and regulations governing the program shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The rules may include, as necessary, but need not be limited to:

The application, enrollment and disenrollment processes for the program;

The benefit package to be provided through the program;

Provisions for participant cost sharing, if any, including, at the department's discretion:

The establishment of enrollment fees, premiums, deductibles and copayments; and

The process for setting the amounts of enrollment fees, premiums, deductibles, and copayments, taking into account a participant's family income;

The type of professionals or other provider entities who may deliver services or direct the delivery of services and the qualifications required of those professionals or entities; and

Provisions regarding the sharing of health information under this part.

In adopting rules, the department shall consider the federal requirements on which the receipt of Title XXI (42 U.S.C. § 1397aa et seq.), funding is contingent and shall not establish any program criteria or requirements that will disqualify the program from that funding. Rules adopted by the department must, when appropriate, take into account the availability of appropriated funds.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 7; 2009, ch. 566, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1111. Annual report. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

This part shall be reviewed annually by the commerce and labor committee of the senate, the insurance committee of the house of representatives, the finance, ways and means committee of the senate and the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives, and these committees shall recommend necessary changes to the governor and the general assembly.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 10; 2013, ch. 236, § 17; 2019, ch. 345, § 133.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the insurance committee of the house of representatives” for “the insurance and banking committee of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.

71-3-1112. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §71-3-1112 (Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(b)) concerning the creation of special joint committee, was deleted as obsolete.

71-3-1113. Repealer. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

This part shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a); 2010, ch. 872, § 6; 2015, ch. 343, § 1; 2020, ch. 582, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2020”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 2. March 19, 2020.

71-3-1114. Email notice that enrollee must redetermine eligibility. [Effective until June 30, 2025.]

As a part of the process for redetermining an enrollee's eligibility for the program, the department shall establish a procedure that sends an email notice to the enrollee, or the parent or guardian of the enrollee, that the enrollee must redetermine eligibility for the program. The email notice is required only when the department has an email address for the enrollee or the parent or guardian of the enrollee.

Acts 2018, ch. 943, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 867, § 14(a), as amended by Acts 2010, ch. 872, § 6, and further amended by Acts 2015, ch. 343, § 1, and further amended by Acts 2020, ch. 582, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall be repealed on June 30, 2025.

Cross-References. Repealer, §71-3-1113.